test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-subst-2tav-o_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - kolo:
    kolo+N+Sg+Nom:  kolo
    kolo+N+Sg+Gen:  kolo
    kolo+N+Sg+Acc:  kolo
    kolo+N+Sg+Ill:  kolon
    kolo+N+Sg+Loc:  kooloost
    kolo+N+Sg+Com:  koloin
    kolo+N+Sg+Abe:  kolottáá
    kolo+N+Ess:  kolloon
    kolo+N+Par:  kollood
    kolo+N+Pl+Nom:  koloh
    kolo+N+Pl+Gen:  koloi
    kolo+N+Pl+Acc:  koloid
    kolo+N+Pl+Ill:  koloid
    kolo+N+Pl+Loc:  koloin
    kolo+N+Pl+Com:  koloiguin
    kolo+N+Pl+Abe:  koloittáá

  Noun - ronno:
    ronno+N+Sg+Nom:  ronno
    ronno+N+Sg+Gen:  rono
    ronno+N+Sg+Acc:  rono
    ronno+N+Sg+Ill:  roonon
    ronno+N+Sg+Loc:  ronnoost
    ronno+N+Sg+Com:  ronnoin
    ronno+N+Sg+Abe:  ronottáá
    ronno+N+Ess:  ronnon
    ronno+N+Par:  ronnod
    ronno+N+Pl+Nom:  ronoh
    ronno+N+Pl+Gen:  ronoi
    ronno+N+Pl+Acc:  ronnoid
    ronno+N+Pl+Ill:  ronnoid
    ronno+N+Pl+Loc:  ronnoin
    ronno+N+Pl+Com:  ronoiguin
    ronno+N+Pl+Abe:  ronoittáá

  Noun - joto:
    joto+N+Sg+Nom:  joto
    joto+N+Sg+Gen:  jođo
    joto+N+Sg+Acc:  jođo
    joto+N+Sg+Ill:  joton
    joto+N+Sg+Loc:  joođoost
    joto+N+Sg+Com:  jođoin
    joto+N+Sg+Abe:  jođottáá
    joto+N+Ess:  jottoon
    joto+N+Par:  jottood
    joto+N+Pl+Nom:  jođoh
    joto+N+Pl+Gen:  jođoi
    joto+N+Pl+Acc:  jođoid
    joto+N+Pl+Ill:  jođoid
    joto+N+Pl+Loc:  jođoin
    joto+N+Pl+Com:  jođoiguin
    joto+N+Pl+Abe:  jođoittáá

  Noun - roto:
    roto+N+Sg+Nom:  roto
    roto+N+Sg+Gen:  rođo
    roto+N+Sg+Acc:  rođo
    roto+N+Sg+Ill:  roton
    roto+N+Sg+Loc:  roođoost
    roto+N+Sg+Com:  rođoin
    roto+N+Sg+Abe:  rođottáá
    roto+N+Ess:  rottoon
    roto+N+Par:  rottood
    roto+N+Pl+Nom:  rođoh
    roto+N+Pl+Gen:  rođoi
    roto+N+Pl+Acc:  rođoid
    roto+N+Pl+Ill:  rođoid
    roto+N+Pl+Loc:  rođoin
    roto+N+Pl+Com:  rođoiguin
    roto+N+Pl+Abe:  rođoiguin

  Noun - potto:
    potto+N+Sg+Nom:  potto
    potto+N+Sg+Gen:  poto
    potto+N+Sg+Acc:  poto
    potto+N+Sg+Ill:  pooton
    potto+N+Sg+Loc:  pottoost
    potto+N+Sg+Com:  pottoin
    potto+N+Sg+Abe:  potottáá
    potto+N+Ess:  potton
    potto+N+Par:  pottod
    potto+N+Pl+Nom:  potoh
    potto+N+Pl+Gen:  potoi
    potto+N+Pl+Acc:  pottoid
    potto+N+Pl+Ill:  pottoid
    potto+N+Pl+Loc:  potoin
    potto+N+Pl+Com:  potoiguin
    potto+N+Pl+Abe:  potoittáá

  Noun - torvo:
    torvo+N+Sg+Nom:  torvo
    torvo+N+Sg+Gen:  torvo
    torvo+N+Sg+Acc:  torvo
    torvo+N+Sg+Ill:  toorvon
    torvo+N+Sg+Loc:  torvoost
    torvo+N+Sg+Com:  torvoin
    torvo+N+Sg+Abe:  torvottáá
    torvo+N+Ess:  torvon
    torvo+N+Par:  torvod
    torvo+N+Pl+Nom:  torvoh
    torvo+N+Pl+Gen:  torvoi
    torvo+N+Pl+Acc:  torvoid
    torvo+N+Pl+Ill:  torvoid
    torvo+N+Pl+Loc:  torvoin
    torvo+N+Pl+Com:  torvoiguin
    torvo+N+Pl+Abe:  torvoittáá

  Noun - kođo:
    kođo+N+Sg+Nom:  kođo
    kođo+N+Sg+Gen:  kođo
    kođo+N+Sg+Acc:  kođo
    kođo+N+Sg+Ill:  kođon
    kođo+N+Sg+Loc:  koođoost
    kođo+N+Sg+Com:  kođoin
    kođo+N+Sg+Abe:  kođottáá
    kođo+N+Ess:  kođđoon
    kođo+N+Par:  kođđood
    kođo+N+Pl+Nom:  kođoh
    kođo+N+Pl+Gen:  kođoi
    kođo+N+Pl+Acc:  kođoid
    kođo+N+Pl+Ill:  kođoid
    kođo+N+Pl+Loc:  kođoin
    kođo+N+Pl+Com:  kođoiguin
    kođo+N+Pl+Abe:  kođoittáá

  Noun - uddo:
    uddo+N+Sg+Nom:  uddo
    uddo+N+Sg+Gen:  udo
    uddo+N+Sg+Acc:  udo
    uddo+N+Sg+Ill:  uudon
    uddo+N+Sg+Loc:  uddoost
    uddo+N+Sg+Com:  uddoin
    uddo+N+Sg+Abe:  udottáá
    uddo+N+Ess:  uddon
    uddo+N+Par:  uddod
    uddo+N+Pl+Nom:  udoh
    uddo+N+Pl+Gen:  udoi
    uddo+N+Pl+Acc:  uddoid
    uddo+N+Pl+Ill:  uddoid
    uddo+N+Pl+Loc:  udoin
    uddo+N+Pl+Com:  udoiguin
    uddo+N+Pl+Abe:  udoittáá

  Noun - muddo:
    muddo+N+Sg+Nom:  muddo
    muddo+N+Sg+Gen:  mudo
    muddo+N+Sg+Acc:  mudo
    muddo+N+Sg+Ill:  muudon
    muddo+N+Sg+Loc:  muddoost
    muddo+N+Sg+Com:  muddoin
    muddo+N+Sg+Abe:  mudottáá
    muddo+N+Ess:  muddon
    muddo+N+Par:  muddod
    muddo+N+Pl+Nom:  mudoh
    muddo+N+Pl+Gen:  mudoi
    muddo+N+Pl+Acc:  muddoid
    muddo+N+Pl+Ill:  muddoid
    muddo+N+Pl+Loc:  mudoin
    muddo+N+Pl+Com:  mudoiguin
    muddo+N+Pl+Abe:  mudoittáá

  Noun - puddo:
    puddo+N+Sg+Nom:  puddo
    puddo+N+Sg+Gen:  pudo
    puddo+N+Sg+Acc:  pudo
    puddo+N+Sg+Ill:  puudon
    puddo+N+Sg+Loc:  puddoost
    puddo+N+Sg+Com:  puddoin
    puddo+N+Sg+Abe:  pudottáá
    puddo+N+Ess:  puddon
    puddo+N+Par:  puddod
    puddo+N+Pl+Nom:  pudoh
    puddo+N+Pl+Gen:  pudoi
    puddo+N+Pl+Acc:  puddoid
    puddo+N+Pl+Ill:  puddoid
    puddo+N+Pl+Loc:  pudoin
    puddo+N+Pl+Com:  pudoiguin
    puddo+N+Pl+Abe:  pudoittáá

  Noun - suddo:
    suddo+N+Sg+Nom:  suddo
    suddo+N+Sg+Gen:  sudo
    suddo+N+Sg+Acc:  sudo
    suddo+N+Sg+Ill:  suudon
    suddo+N+Sg+Loc:  suddoost
    suddo+N+Sg+Com:  suddoin
    suddo+N+Sg+Abe:  sudottáá
    suddo+N+Ess:  suddon
    suddo+N+Par:  suddod
    suddo+N+Pl+Nom:  sudoh
    suddo+N+Pl+Gen:  sudoi
    suddo+N+Pl+Acc:  suddoid
    suddo+N+Pl+Ill:  suddoid
    suddo+N+Pl+Loc:  sudoin
    suddo+N+Pl+Com:  sudoiguin
    suddo+N+Pl+Abe:  sudoittáá

  Noun - purdo:
    purdo+N+Sg+Nom:  purdo
    purdo+N+Sg+Gen:  purdo
    purdo+N+Sg+Acc:  purdo
    purdo+N+Sg+Ill:  puurdon
    purdo+N+Sg+Loc:  purdoost
    purdo+N+Sg+Com:  purdoin
    purdo+N+Sg+Abe:  purdottáá
    purdo+N+Ess:  purdon
    purdo+N+Par:  purdod
    purdo+N+Pl+Nom:  purdoh
    purdo+N+Pl+Gen:  purdoi
    purdo+N+Pl+Acc:  purdoid
    purdo+N+Pl+Ill:  purdoid
    purdo+N+Pl+Loc:  purdoin
    purdo+N+Pl+Com:  purdoiguin
    purdo+N+Pl+Abe:  purdoittáá

  Noun - ruŋgo:
    ruŋgo+N+Sg+Nom:  ruŋgo
    ruŋgo+N+Sg+Gen:  ruŋgo
    ruŋgo+N+Sg+Acc:  ruŋgo
    ruŋgo+N+Sg+Ill:  ruuŋgon
    ruŋgo+N+Sg+Loc:  ruŋgoost
    ruŋgo+N+Sg+Com:  ruŋgoin
    ruŋgo+N+Sg+Abe:  ruŋgottáá
    ruŋgo+N+Ess:  ruŋgon
    ruŋgo+N+Par:  ruŋgod
    ruŋgo+N+Pl+Nom:  ruŋgoh
    ruŋgo+N+Pl+Gen:  ruŋgoi
    ruŋgo+N+Pl+Acc:  ruŋgoid
    ruŋgo+N+Pl+Ill:  ruŋgoid
    ruŋgo+N+Pl+Loc:  ruŋgoin
    ruŋgo+N+Pl+Com:  ruŋgoiguin
    ruŋgo+N+Pl+Abe:  ruŋgoittáá

  Noun - urkko:
    urkko+N+Sg+Nom:  urkko
    urkko+N+Sg+Gen:  urko
    urkko+N+Sg+Acc:  urko
    urkko+N+Sg+Ill:  uurkon
    urkko+N+Sg+Loc:  urkkoost
    urkko+N+Sg+Com:  urkkoin
    urkko+N+Sg+Abe:  urkottáá
    urkko+N+Ess:  urkkon
    urkko+N+Par:  urkkod
    urkko+N+Pl+Nom:  urkoh
    urkko+N+Pl+Gen:  urkoi
    urkko+N+Pl+Acc:  urkkoid
    urkko+N+Pl+Ill:  urkkoid
    urkko+N+Pl+Loc:  urkoin
    urkko+N+Pl+Com:  urkoiguin
    urkko+N+Pl+Abe:  urkoittáá

  Noun - lukko:
    lukko+N+Sg+Nom:  lukko
    lukko+N+Sg+Gen:  luho
    lukko+N+Sg+Acc:  luho
    lukko+N+Sg+Ill:  luukon
    lukko+N+Sg+Loc:  luhhoost
    lukko+N+Sg+Com:  luhhoin
    lukko+N+Sg+Abe:  luhottáá
    lukko+N+Ess:  lukkon
    lukko+N+Par:  lukkod
    lukko+N+Pl+Nom:  luhoh
    lukko+N+Pl+Gen:  luhoi
    lukko+N+Pl+Acc:  luhoid
    lukko+N+Pl+Ill:  luhhoid
    lukko+N+Pl+Loc:  luhoin
    lukko+N+Pl+Com:  luhoiguin
    lukko+N+Pl+Abe:  luhoittáá

  Noun - puško:
    puško+N+Sg+Nom:  puško
    puško+N+Sg+Gen:  puško
    puško+N+Sg+Acc:  puško
    puško+N+Sg+Ill:  puuškon
    puško+N+Sg+Loc:  puškoost
    puško+N+Sg+Com:  puškoin
    puško+N+Sg+Abe:  puškottáá
    puško+N+Ess:  puškon
    puško+N+Par:  puškod
    puško+N+Pl+Nom:  puškoh
    puško+N+Pl+Gen:  puškoi
    puško+N+Pl+Acc:  puškoid
    puško+N+Pl+Ill:  puškoid
    puško+N+Pl+Loc:  puškoin
    puško+N+Pl+Com:  puškoiguin
    puško+N+Pl+Abe:  puškoittáá

  Noun - ullo:
    ullo+N+Sg+Nom:  ullo
    ullo+N+Sg+Gen:  ulo
    ullo+N+Sg+Acc:  ulo
    ullo+N+Sg+Ill:  uulon
    ullo+N+Sg+Loc:  ulloost
    ullo+N+Sg+Com:  ulloin
    ullo+N+Sg+Abe:  ulottáá
    ullo+N+Ess:  ullon
    ullo+N+Par:  ullod
    ullo+N+Pl+Nom:  uloh
    ullo+N+Pl+Gen:  uloi
    ullo+N+Pl+Acc:  ulloid
    ullo+N+Pl+Ill:  ulloid
    ullo+N+Pl+Loc:  uloin
    ullo+N+Pl+Com:  uloiguin
    ullo+N+Pl+Abe:  uloittáá

  Noun - kulo:
    kulo+N+Sg+Nom:  kulo
    kulo+N+Sg+Gen:  kulo
    kulo+N+Sg+Acc:  kulo
    kulo+N+Sg+Ill:  kulon
    kulo+N+Sg+Loc:  kuuloost
    kulo+N+Sg+Com:  kuloin
    kulo+N+Sg+Abe:  kulottáá
    kulo+N+Ess:  kulloon
    kulo+N+Par:  kullood
    kulo+N+Pl+Nom:  kuloh
    kulo+N+Pl+Gen:  kuloi
    kulo+N+Pl+Acc:  kuloid
    kulo+N+Pl+Ill:  kuloid
    kulo+N+Pl+Loc:  kuloin
    kulo+N+Pl+Com:  kuloiguin
    kulo+N+Pl+Abe:  kuloittáá

  Noun - humo:
    humo+N+Sg+Nom:  humo
    humo+N+Sg+Gen:  humo
    humo+N+Sg+Acc:  humo
    humo+N+Sg+Ill:  huumon
    humo+N+Sg+Loc:  huumoost
    humo+N+Sg+Com:  humoin
    humo+N+Sg+Abe:  humottáá
    humo+N+Ess:  hummoon
    humo+N+Pl+Nom:  humoh
    humo+N+Pl+Gen:  humoi
    humo+N+Pl+Acc:  humoid
    humo+N+Pl+Ill:  humoid
    humo+N+Pl+Loc:  humoin
    humo+N+Pl+Com:  humoiguin
    humo+N+Pl+Abe:  humoittáá

  Noun - sutto:
    sutto+N+Sg+Nom:  sutto
    sutto+N+Sg+Gen:  suto
    sutto+N+Sg+Acc:  suto
    sutto+N+Sg+Ill:  suuton
    sutto+N+Sg+Loc:  suttoost
    sutto+N+Sg+Com:  suttoin
    sutto+N+Sg+Abe:  sutottáá
    sutto+N+Ess:  sutton
    sutto+N+Par:  suttod
    sutto+N+Pl+Nom:  sutoh
    sutto+N+Pl+Gen:  sutoi
    sutto+N+Pl+Acc: [sutoid, suttoid]
    sutto+N+Pl+Ill:  suttoid
    sutto+N+Pl+Loc:  sutooin
    sutto+N+Pl+Com:  sutoiguin
    sutto+N+Pl+Abe:  sutoittáá

  Noun - mušto:
    mušto+N+Sg+Nom:  mušto
    mušto+N+Sg+Gen:  mušto
    mušto+N+Sg+Acc:  mušto
    mušto+N+Sg+Ill:  muušton
    mušto+N+Sg+Loc:  muštoost
    mušto+N+Sg+Com:  muštoin
    mušto+N+Sg+Abe:  muštottáá
    mušto+N+Ess:  mušton
    mušto+N+Pl+Nom:  muštoh
    mušto+N+Pl+Gen:  muštoi
    mušto+N+Pl+Acc:  muštoid
    mušto+N+Pl+Ill:  muštoid
    mušto+N+Pl+Loc:  muštoin
    mušto+N+Pl+Com:  muštoiguin
    mušto+N+Pl+Abe:  muštoittáá

  Noun - euro:
    euro+N+Sg+Nom:  euro
    euro+N+Sg+Gen:  euro
    euro+N+Sg+Acc:  euro
    euro+N+Sg+Ill:  euron
    euro+N+Sg+Loc:  eurost
    euro+N+Sg+Com:  euroin
    euro+N+Sg+Abe:  eurottáá
    euro+N+Ess:  euron
    euro+N+Pl+Nom:  euroh
    euro+N+Pl+Gen:  euroi
    euro+N+Pl+Acc:  euroid
    euro+N+Pl+Ill:  euroid
    euro+N+Pl+Loc:  euroin
    euro+N+Pl+Com:  euroiguin
    euro+N+Pl+Abe:  euroittáá
